Florida, session 2026, HB1093.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of section
255.065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
255.065 Public-private partnerships.—
(1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(i) "Qualifying project" means:
1. A facility or project that serves a public purpose,
including, but not limited to, any ferry or mass transit
facility, vehicle parking facility, airport or seaport facility,
rail facility or project, fuel supply facility, oil or gas
pipeline, medical or nursing care facility, recreational
facility, sporting or cultural facility, or educational facility
or other building or facility that is used or will be used by a
public educational institution, or any other public facility or
infrastructure that is used or will be used by the public at
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1093 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 1093 2026 Legislature
large or in support of an accepted public purpose or activity;
2. An improvement, including equipment, of a building that
will be principally used by a public entity or the public at
large or that supports a service delivery system in the public
sector;
3. A water, wastewater, or surface water management
facility or other related infrastructure; or
4. Notwithstanding any provision of this section, for
projects that involve a facility owned or operated by the
governing board of a county, district, or municipal hospital or
health care system, or projects that involve a facility owned or
operated by a municipal electric utility, only those projects
that the governing board designates as qualifying projects
pursuant to this section; or
5. Vertiports and charging systems.
Section 2. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
332.007, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (e) is
added to subsection (6) of that section, to read:
332.007 Administration and financing of aviation and
airport programs and projects; state plan.—
(2)
(c) Each commercial service airport as defined in s.
332.0075 shall establish and maintain a comprehensive airport
infrastructure program to ensure the ongoing preservation of
airport infrastructure and facilities in safe and serviceable
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1093 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 1093 2026 Legislature
condition. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "airport
infrastructure" means the facilities, systems, and structural
components of an airport necessary for the safe and efficient
movement of people and goods. The term includes vertiport pads,
safety zones, charging systems, grid upgrades, and resilience
energy systems. Beginning November 1, 2025, and annually
thereafter, each commercial service airport shall provide a
certification to the department, in a manner prescribed by the
department, that it has established and maintains a
comprehensive airport infrastructure program. The comprehensive
airport infrastructure program report, and related documents and
records, must be open to inspection by the department and
maintained by the airport for at least 5 years. The
comprehensive airport infrastructure program must, at a minimum,
include all of the following:
1. Identification of airport infrastructure subject to
inspection and the schedule for the completion of such
inspections, taking into consideration the age, type, intended
use, and criticality of the infrastructure to undisrupted
commercial or cargo operations.
2. A preventative maintenance program for routine
maintenance of airport infrastructure, for both commercial and
cargo operations.
3. A plan to complete any necessary repairs to, or
rehabilitation or reconstruction of, airport infrastructure,
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1093 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 1093 2026 Legislature
including prioritization and anticipated timeframe for
completion of the work.
4. A progress report of inspections and their outcomes,
preventative maintenance, and previously identified repair to,
or rehabilitation or reconstruction of, airport infrastructure.
The progress report must include any changes in timeline for
completion, changes in cost estimates, and reasons any
inspection, preventative maintenance, or repair or
rehabilitation did not take place.
(6) Subject to the availability of appropriated funds, the
department may participate in the capital cost of eligible
public-use airport and aviation development projects in
accordance with the following rates, unless otherwise provided
in the General Appropriations Act or the substantive bill
implementing the General Appropriations Act:
(e) When federal funds are not available, the department
may fund up to 100 percent of the project costs of a public
vertiport. If federal funds are available, the department may
fund up to 80 percent of the nonfederal share of such project
costs.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1093 -03-er